Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB104.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Office of Inspector General Complement Increase Act.Section 2. Complement of Office of Inspector General.(a) Pilot program.--Subject to sufficient money being appropriated, the Office of Inspector General shall implement and administer a pilot program to increase the complement of Office of Inspector General employees to investigate fraud, waste, misconduct and abuse claims from the Department of Human Services and the Department of Health for a period of not less than two years. The additional employees shall be hired within six months of the effective date of this subsection.(b) Number of additional employees.--The number of new 123456789101112131415161718 employees hired under subsection (a) shall be sufficient to increase the total complement of employees in the Office of Inspector General on January 31, 2025, by at least 50%.Section 3. Report to General Assembly.(a) Issuance.--Not later than one year after all of the additional employees are hired under section 2, the Office of Inspector General shall issue a written report containing the information specified under subsection (b).(b) Contents.--The report under this section must include the following information:(1) The number of total investigations completed by the Office of Inspector General, including a breakdown by:(i) New versus prior employees.(ii) Pre-pilot program versus one year into the pilot program.(2) The dollar amount of recovery and costs avoidance per employee, including a breakdown by:(i) New versus prior employees.(ii) Pre-pilot program versus one year into the pilot program.(3) The number of investigations filed with the Office of Inspector General that were not completed, including a breakdown by:(i) New versus prior employees.(ii) Pre-pilot program versus one year into the pilot program.(4) The additional salary and other costs associated with each new employee.(5) The total cost to implement and administer the pilot program.20250SB0104PN0057 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Any additional cost-saving efforts initiated by the Office of Inspector General as a result of additional employees.(c) Submittal.--The Office of Inspector General shall submit the report under this section to the following:(1) The Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(4) The Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Public record.--The report under this section shall be a public record in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 4. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0104PN0057 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617